Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1230
Sections; supplemental to other law.

Sections 79-1202 to 79-1230 shall be supplemental to any other law and shall not affect the reorganization of school districts as provided in the Reorganization of School Districts Act.

Laws 1965, c. 504, § 12, p. 1612;

Laws 1991, LB 511, § 66;

Laws 1992, LB 245, § 71;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2212;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 947.

Reorganization of School Districts Act, see section 79-432.